Hawaii statutes.
§286-107 License renewals; procedures and requirements.
(a) The examiner of drivers may accept an application for a renewal of a
driver's license made not more than six months prior to the date of expiration.

If, however, the
renewal is not applied for within ninety days after the expiration of the
license, the applicant for renewal shall be treated as an applicant for a new
license and examined as provided in section 286-108.

(b) Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (c), an applicant for a renewal of a driver's
license under this section, or the reactivation of an expired license under
section 286-107.5(a), shall appear in person before the examiner of drivers and
the examiner of drivers shall administer such physical examinations as the state
director of transportation deems necessary to determine the applicant's fitness
to continue to operate a motor vehicle.

(c) Any person who
holds a category (1), (2), or (3) license issued under this part who is unable
to appear in person before the examiner of drivers to apply for a renewal of
the driver's license, may, if the person is not disqualified from renewing the
license under subsection (a) except as provided under subsection (h), apply for
a renewal by mail. The applicant's request to have the license renewed by mail
must be received by the examiner of drivers within ninety days after the
expiration of the license or it shall be treated as an application for
reactivation of an expired license under section 286-107.5. The examiner of
drivers shall, upon receipt of the request, furnish the applicant with all
necessary forms and instructions. An application for renewal made pursuant to
this subsection shall be accompanied by a statement from a licensed physician,
physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse certifying that the
applicant was examined by the licensed physician, physician assistant, or
advanced practice registered nurse not more than six months prior to the
expiration date of the applicant's license and that the applicant was found by
the examination to have met the physical requirements established by the state
director of transportation for the renewal of licenses. The application for
renewal shall also be accompanied by:

(1) A notarized statement of the applicant certifying
that the applicant does not possess any valid license to operate the same or
similar category or categories of motor vehicles, issued by another licensing
authority (unless the license is concurrently surrendered); and

(2) Such other information as may be required by the
examiner of drivers that is reasonably necessary to confirm the identity of the
applicant and the applicant's fitness to continue to operate a motor vehicle.

(d) An applicant for
a renewal of the applicant's driver's license, whether applying pursuant to
subsections (b) or (c), shall pay the fee determined by the council of the
appropriate county. Payment of the fee shall be by certified check or money
order, tendered together with the application.

(e) No driver's
license shall be renewed by the examiner of drivers unless:

(1) The examiner of drivers is satisfied of the
applicant's fitness to continue to operate a motor vehicle;

(2) The fee required by subsection (d) is tendered
together with the application for renewal; and

(3) The applicant complies with section 286-102.5.

(f) No driver's license shall be renewable by
mail:

(1) For more than
two consecutive renewals, regardless of whether the license expires, as
provided under section 286-106, on the eighth, fourth, or second birthday after
issuance; or

(2) Sixteen years
have lapsed since the applicant had appeared in person;

provided that this subsection shall not apply to a
resident military person or that person's immediate family if the resident
military person resides outside the State on official military orders.

(g) Notwithstanding subsection (a), any
applicant for a renewal of a driver's license who is a member of any component
of the United States armed forces and who is on active federal service outside
of the State at the time the applicant's license should be renewed, may file an
application for a renewal of the driver's license, which shall be accompanied
by verification of federal active service outside the State as required by the
examiner of drivers, within ninety days of the applicant's return to the State
or discharge from hospitalization. The examiner of drivers may waive the
reactivation fee otherwise required by section 286-107.5.

(h) The state director of transportation shall
adopt rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 91, necessary for the purposes
of this section, including rules and regulations governing the effect to be
given to convictions for violations of traffic laws of a foreign jurisdiction,
upon license renewal procedures. [L 1974, c 97, §3; am L 1975, c 194, §§1, 2;
am L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, §12; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 232, §1; am L 1987, c
318, §1; am L 1997, c 60, §§2, 3 and c 330, §4; am L 2001, c 86, §4; am L 2002,
c 48, §1; am L 2006, c 221, §1; am L 2009, c 151, §4; am L 2014, c 45, §3; am L
2016, c 15, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next